Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.010

Association created.

The public necessity for the coordination of programs and procedures pertaining to policymaking and to control and management among the school districts of the state is hereby recognized, and in the furtherance of such coordination there is hereby created for said purpose an agency of the state to be known as the Washington state school directors' association, hereinafter designated as the school directors' association.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.010. Prior: 1947 c 169 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4709-20. Formerly RCW 28A.61.010, 28.58.320.]